Illinois, session 104th, SB4062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Article Division 12.2 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/Art. 11 Div. 12.2 heading new)7DIVISION 12.2. IMPACT MITIGATION FEES 8    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-1 new)9    Sec. 11-12.2-1. Legislative findings and purpose.10    (a) The General Assembly finds that:11        (1) Illinois communities require predictable, 12    evidence-based standards to ensure that new development 13    contributes fairly to public services, infrastructure, 14    schools, parks, and other essential facilities.15        (2) Existing State laws authorize land dedication or 16    fees instead of land dedication but lack uniform, 17    transparent formulas that reflect the true impacts of 18    residential development.19        (3) The absence of standardized methodologies results 20    in inconsistent practices, prolonged negotiations, and 21    uncertainty for developers and units of local governments.22        (4) Establishing statewide formulas for calculating   SB4062- 2 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1    impact mitigation fees will create fairness, increase 2    certainty, and streamline housing production statewide.3    (b) The purpose of this Division is to ensure that impact 4fees imposed by municipalities in this State are predictable, 5proportionate, transparent, and supportive of housing 6production, including missing middle housing. This Act 7establishes statewide model impact-fee formulas and 8demographic multipliers and requires municipal use of these 9formulas when imposing impact fees on residential development.  10    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-5 new)11    Sec. 11-12.2-5. Definitions. As used in this Division:12    "Residential development" means construction, conversion, 13or placement of new housing units, including single-family 14homes, multifamily dwellings, and middle housing.15    "Standardized impact mitigation fee" means a fee 16calculated using the formulas established under this Division 17to mitigate the measurable impacts of residential development. 18    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-10 new)19    Sec. 11-12.2-10. Applicability.20    (a) The formulas established in this Division apply only 21to municipalities authorized to levy impact fees.22    (b) Municipalities may not impose impact fees based on any 23methodology other than the formulas in this Division, unless 24expressly allowed in Section 11-12.2-40.  SB4062- 3 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1    (c) Municipalities may adopt fees lower than the 2formula-derived levels but may not exceed formula-based 3maximums.4    (d) Nothing in this Division confers new authority upon 5non-home rule municipalities.  6    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-15 new)7    Sec. 11-12.2-15. Mandatory statewide formulas.8    (a) Municipalities authorized to levy impact fees must 9calculate fees using the statewide formula structure issued by 10the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, which 11shall cover:12        (1) school impact mitigation;13        (2) parks and open space;14        (3) transportation;15        (4) public safety; and16        (5) stormwater and other public facilities.17    (b) The formulas shall incorporate the State-issued 18components under Section 11-12.2-20, including:19        (1) standardized demand multipliers;20        (2) baseline capital cost tables;21        (3) model worksheets and formula templates;22        (4) allowable adjustment factors; and23        (5) model ordinance requirements.24    (c) Municipalities must use the State-issued model 25worksheet or digital calculator to generate their fee   SB4062- 4 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1schedules. No alternative calculation method may be used.2    (d) Middle housing must receive fee adjustments based on 3State-established multipliers that reflect lower average 4household size and lower per-unit service demand.  5    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-20 new)6    Sec. 11-12.2-20. State-issued formula components. The 7Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall issue, 8update annually, and make publicly available the following 9mandatory information to be used in the calculation of 10standardized impact mitigation fees:11        (1) Multipliers estimating service demand by housing 12    type, including, but not limited to:13            (A) student-generation rates;14            (B) household population multipliers;15            (C) peak-hour trip generation;16            (D) public safety service load factors; and17            (E) stormwater or utility demand coefficients.18        The multipliers under this paragraph replace all 19    municipal multipliers unless the Department of Commerce 20    and Economic Opportunity authorizes a documented 21    variation.22        (2) Statewide per-capita or per-unit capital cost 23    estimates for schools, parks, transportation, public 24    safety, and stormwater facilities. The Department of 25    Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall define permissible   SB4062- 5 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1    deviations, including allowable ranges for:2            (A) land acquisition costs;3            (B) construction and capital costs; and4            (C) capacity expansion costs.5        (3) The Department of Commerce and Economic 6    Opportunity must provide downloadable spreadsheets or 7    web-based calculators embedding all formulas, multipliers, 8    and cost tables. Municipalities authorized to levy impact 9    fees must use these worksheets to produce their fee 10    schedules. Worksheets must automatically generate a 11    public-facing fee schedule for municipal adoption.12        (4) The Department of Commerce and Economic 13    Opportunity shall issue statewide adjustment factors 14    permitting controlled variation, including:15            (A) land-value cost adjustments within 16        State-defined bands;17            (B) infill or redevelopment discount factors;18            (C) documented higher-cost construction market 19        adjustments; and20            (D) middle-housing elasticity adjustments.21        Adjustment factors under this paragraph may not exceed 22    State-defined maximums or minimums.23        (5) The Department of Commerce and Economic 24    Opportunity shall issue a model impact fee ordinance that 25    municipalities authorized to levy impact fees must adopt 26    verbatim or with only technical deviations. The model   SB4062- 6 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1    ordinance must include:2            (A) definitions;3            (B) applicability;4            (C) formula structure;5            (D) exemptions;6            (E) reporting;7            (F) annual fee recalibration process; and8            (G) appeal procedures conforming to constitutional 9        nexus standards.  10    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-30 new)11    Sec. 11-12.2-30. Public fee schedule. 12    (a) Each municipality authorized to levy impact fees must, 13before imposing any fee, publish a schedule identifying:14        (1) the formula-generated maximum fee per unit type;15        (2) the State-issued multipliers and assumptions used;16        (3) any allowable municipal adjustment factors 17    applied; and18        (4) any municipal reductions adopted.19    (b) Only fees produced through the State worksheet may be 20imposed. 21    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-40 new)22    Sec. 11-12.2-40. Interaction with land dedication 23requirements.24    (a) If the laws of this State authorize land dedication or   SB4062- 7 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1fees instead of land dedication, then a standardized impact 2mitigation fee is a fee instead of land dedication unless a 3municipal ordinance expressly requires both a fee and land 4dedication.5    (b) A pre-existing land dedication requirement may 6continue only if:7        (1) it existed prior to the effective date of this 8    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly; and9        (2) a formula-based cash alternative using the State 10    worksheets is available.11    (c) Any land dedication requirement without a cash 12alternative is superseded.  13    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-45 new)14    Sec. 11-12.2-45. Exemptions and reductions.15    (a) Mandatory exemptions shall include:16        (1) units affordable to households equals 60% AMI;17        (2) permanent supportive housing;18        (3) transitional housing; and19        (4) accessory dwelling units.20    (b) Municipalities may grant additional reductions for:21        (1) middle housing;22        (2) transit-oriented development;23        (3) redevelopment of vacant, underutilized, or 24    brownfield parcels; and25        (4) a building undergoing a change of use from a   SB4062- 8 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1    nonresidential to a residential use.  2    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-50 new)3    Sec. 11-12.2-50. Report requirements.4    (a) Municipalities authorized to levy impact fees must 5annually report to the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity:7        (1) fees collected;8        (2) fund expenditures;9        (3) fund balances;10        (4) number and type of housing units approved; and11        (5) any use of adjustment factors.12    (b) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 13shall publish online the reports that municipalities submit 14under subsection (a). 15    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-55 new)16    Sec. 11-12.2-55. Rulemaking.17    (a) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 18shall adopt rules necessary to implement this Division, 19including:20        (1) formula methodologies;21        (2) multipliers;22        (3) capital cost tables;23        (4) allowable adjustment ranges;24        (5) worksheets and calculators; and  SB4062- 9 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1        (6) model ordinances.2    (b) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 3shall update multipliers, capital cost tables, and worksheets 4no less frequently than once every 12 months.  5    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-60 new)6    Sec. 11-12.2-60. Implementation and transition.7    (a) The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 8shall adopt initial formulas, multipliers, worksheets, and the 9model ordinance required under this Division no later than 18 10months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 11104th General Assembly.12    (b) A municipality authorized to levy impact fees shall 13adopt the model ordinance and fee schedule consistent with 14this Division no later than 12 months after the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity adopts the initial formulas 16and model ordinance.17    (c) Until a municipality adopts the model ordinance 18required under this Division, it may continue to impose impact 19fees under its existing ordinances.20    (d) Beginning 30 months after the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, any impact fee 22imposed on residential development must be calculated in 23accordance with this Division and rules adopted under this 24Division.25    (e) An application for residential development that is   SB4062- 10 -LRB104 20892 RTM 34566 b1complete under the laws of the municipality before the 2municipality adopts the model ordinance shall be subject to 3the impact fee requirements in effect at the time the 4application was deemed complete.5    (f) Nothing in this Division shall be construed to 6authorize municipality to levy impact fees if it lacked the 7authority to prior to levy impact fees the effective date of 8this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  9    (65 ILCS 5/11-12.2-65 new)10    Sec. 11-12.2-65. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit 11may not regulate plan reviews or building inspections in a 12manner inconsistent with this Division. This Division is a 13limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 14the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 15rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.